Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-253
Authority; issue bonds to renew, pay, or refund bonds.

The authority may issue from time to time bonds to renew or to pay bonds, including the interest on such bonds, and whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of new bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured and whether or not the project as originally financed with the bonds would at the time of the refunding qualify as a project, and may issue bonds partly to refund outstanding bonds and partly for any other of its corporate purposes. The refunding bonds may be sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption, or payment of the bonds to be refunded or exchanged for the bonds to be refunded.

Bonds originally issued by any municipality, county, hospital authority, housing authority, or other political subdivision may be subject to refunding pursuant to this section if the original issuer and beneficiary of the bonds request the authority to issue refunding bonds and the bonds to be refunded financed a project which would at the time of refunding qualify as a project.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 53;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 53;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 71.